Missouri, session 2026, SB996.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 287.200, 287.470, 287.610, 287.615,
287.812, 287.835, and 621.045, RSMo, are repealed and seven new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
287.200, 287.470, 287.610, 287.615, 287.812, 287.835, and
621.045, to read as follows:
287.200. 1. Compensation for permanent total
disability shall be paid during the continuance of such
disability from the date of maximum medical improvement for
the lifetime of the employee at the weekly rate of
compensation in effect under this subsection on the date of
the injury for which compensation is being made. The word
"employee" as used in this section shall not include the
injured worker's dependents, estate, or other persons to
whom compensation may be payable as provided in subsection 1
of section 287.020. The amount of such compensation shall
be computed as follows:
(1) For all injuries occurring on or after September
28, 1983, but before September 28, 1986, the weekly
compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-
thirds percent of the injured employee's average weekly
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 996 2
earnings during the year immediately preceding the injury,
as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly
compensation paid under this subdivision shall not exceed an
amount equal to seventy percent of the state average weekly
wage, as such wage is determined by the division of
employment security, as of the July first immediately
preceding the date of injury;
(2) For all injuries occurring on or after September
28, 1986, but before August 28, 1990, the weekly
compensation shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-
thirds percent of the injured employee's average weekly
earnings during the year immediately preceding the injury,
as of the date of the injury; provided that the weekly
compensation paid under this subdivision shall not exceed an
amount equal to seventy-five percent of the state average
weekly wage, as such wage is determined by the division of
employment security, as of the July first immediately
preceding the date of injury;
(3) For all injuries occurring on or after August 28,
1990, but before August 28, 1991, the weekly compensation
shall be an amount equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent
of the injured employee's average weekly earnings as of the
date of the injury; provided that the weekly compensation
paid under this subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal
to one hundred percent of the state average weekly wage;
(4) For all injuries occurring on or after August 28,
1991, the weekly compensation shall be an amount equal to
sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the injured employee's
average weekly earnings as of the date of the injury;
provided that the weekly compensation paid under this
subdivision shall not exceed an amount equal to one hundred
five percent of the state average weekly wage;

SB 996 3
(5) For all injuries occurring on or after September
28, 1981, the weekly compensation shall in no event be less
than forty dollars per week.
2. Permanent total disability benefits that have
accrued through the date of the injured employee's death are
the only permanent total disability benefits that are to be
paid in accordance with section 287.230. The right to
unaccrued compensation for permanent total disability of an
injured employee terminates on the date of the injured
employee's death in accordance with section 287.230, and
does not survive to the injured employee's dependents,
estate, or other persons to whom compensation might
otherwise be payable.
3. (1) All claims for permanent total disability
shall be determined in accordance with the facts. [When an
injured employee receives an award for permanent total
disability but by the use of glasses, prosthetic appliances,
or physical rehabilitation the employee is restored to his
or her regular work or its equivalent, the life payment
mentioned in subsection 1 of this section shall be suspended
during the time in which the employee is restored to his or
her regular work or its equivalent.] The employer and the
division shall keep the file open in the case during the
lifetime of any injured employee who has received an award
of permanent total disability.
(2) When an injured employee receives an award for
permanent total disability but by the use of glasses,
prosthetic appliances, or physical rehabilitation the
employee is restored to his or her regular work or its
equivalent, the life payment mentioned in subsection 1 of
this section shall be suspended during the time in which the
employee is restored to his or her regular work or its

SB 996 4
equivalent. In any case where the life payment is suspended
under this [subsection] subdivision, the commission may at
reasonable times review the case and either the employee or
the employer may request an informal conference with the
commission relative to the resumption of the employee's
weekly life payment in the case.
(3) Upon filing of a written agreement signed by the
claimant and his or her attorney, the commission shall
change the name, information, or fee arrangement of the
attorney or law firm associated with the claimant's case.
4. For all claims filed on or after January 1, 2014,
for occupational diseases due to toxic exposure which result
in a permanent total disability or death, benefits in this
chapter shall be provided as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, such amount as due to the employee during said
employee's life as provided for under this chapter for an
award of permanent total disability and death, except such
amount shall only be paid when benefits under subdivisions
(2) and (3) of this subsection have been exhausted;
100 (2) For occupational diseases due to toxic exposure,
101 but not including mesothelioma, an amount equal to two
102 hundred percent of the state's average weekly wage as of the
103 date of diagnosis for one hundred weeks paid by the
104 employer; and
105 (3) In cases where occupational diseases due to toxic
106 exposure are diagnosed to be mesothelioma:
107 (a) For employers that have elected to accept
108 mesothelioma liability under this subsection, an additional
109 amount of three hundred percent of the state's average
110 weekly wage for two hundred twelve weeks shall be paid by
111 the employer or group of employers such employer is a member

SB 996 5
112 of. Employers that elect to accept mesothelioma liability
113 under this subsection may do so by either insuring their
114 liability, by qualifying as a self-insurer, or by becoming a
115 member of a group insurance pool. A group of employers may
116 enter into an agreement to pool their liabilities under this
117 subsection. If such group is joined, individual members
118 shall not be required to qualify as individual self-
119 insurers. Such group shall comply with section 287.223. In
120 order for an employer to make such an election, the employer
121 shall provide the department with notice of such an election
122 in a manner established by the department. The provisions
123 of this paragraph shall expire on December 31, 2038; or
124 (b) For employers who reject mesothelioma under this
125 subsection, then the exclusive remedy provisions under
126 section 287.120 shall not apply to such liability. The
127 provisions of this paragraph shall expire on December 31,
128 2038; and
129 (4) The provisions of subdivision (2) and paragraph
130 (a) of subdivision (3) of this subsection shall not be
131 subject to suspension of benefits as provided in subsection
132 3 of this section; and
133 (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of this
134 chapter to the contrary, should the employee die before the
135 additional benefits provided for in subdivision (2) and
136 paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of this subsection are
137 paid, the additional benefits are payable to the employee's
138 spouse or children, natural or adopted, legitimate or
139 illegitimate, in addition to benefits provided under section
140 287.240. If there is no surviving spouse or children and
141 the employee has received less than the additional benefits
142 provided for in subdivision (2) and paragraph (a) of
143 subdivision (3) of this subsection the remainder of such

SB 996 6
144 additional benefits shall be paid as a single payment to the
145 estate of the employee;
146 (6) The provisions of subdivision (1) of this
147 subsection shall not be construed to affect the employee's
148 ability to obtain medical treatment at the employer's
149 expense or any other benefits otherwise available under this
150 chapter.
151 5. Any employee who obtains benefits under subdivision
152 (2) of subsection 4 of this section for acquiring asbestosis
153 who later obtains an award for mesothelioma shall not
154 receive more benefits than such employee would receive
155 having only obtained benefits for mesothelioma under this
156 section.
287.470. 1. Upon its own motion or upon the
application of any party in interest on the ground of a
change in condition, the commission may at any time upon a
rehearing after due notice to the parties interested review
any award and on such review may make an award ending,
diminishing or increasing the compensation previously
awarded, subject to the maximum or minimum provided in this
chapter, and shall immediately send to the parties and the
employer's insurer a copy of the award. No such review
shall affect such award as regards any moneys paid.
2. Upon the filing of a written agreement signed by
the claimant and his or her attorney, the commission shall
change the name, information, or fee arrangement of the
attorney or law firm associated with the claimant's case.
287.610. 1. After August 28, 2005, the division may
appoint additional administrative law judges for a maximum
of [forty] forty-one authorized administrative law judges.
Appropriations shall be based upon necessity, measured by
the requirements and needs of each division office.

SB 996 7
Administrative law judges shall be duly licensed lawyers
under the laws of this state. Administrative law judges
shall not practice law or do law business and shall devote
their whole time to the duties of their office. All
administrative law judges shall retire from such position at
the age of seventy years. The provisions of section 36.025
shall not apply to administrative law judges. The director
of the division of workers' compensation shall publish and
maintain on the division's website the appointment dates or
initial dates of service for all administrative law judges.
2. [The thirteen administrative law judges with the
most years of service shall be subject to a retention vote
on August 28, 2008. The next thirteen administrative law
judges with the most years of service in descending order
shall be subject to a retention vote on August 28, 2012.
Administrative law judges appointed and not previously
referenced in this subsection shall be subject to a
retention vote on August 28, 2016. Subsequent retention
votes shall be held every twelve years. Any administrative
law judge who has received two or more votes of no
confidence under performance audits by the committee shall
not receive a vote of retention.
3. The administrative law judge review committee
members shall not have any direct or indirect employment or
financial connection with a workers' compensation insurance
company, claims adjustment company, health care provider nor
be a practicing workers' compensation attorney. All members
of the committee shall have a working knowledge of workers'
compensation.
4. The committee shall within thirty days of
completing each performance audit make a recommendation of

SB 996 8
confidence or no confidence for each administrative law
judge.
5.] The administrative law judges appointed by the
division shall only have jurisdiction to hear and determine
claims upon original hearing and shall have no jurisdiction
upon any review hearing, either in the way of an appeal from
an original hearing or by way of reopening any prior award,
except to correct a clerical error in an award or settlement
if the correction is made by the administrative law judge
within twenty days of the original award or settlement. The
labor and industrial relations commission may remand any
decision of an administrative law judge for a more complete
finding of facts. The commission may also correct a
clerical error in awards or settlements within thirty days
of its final award. With respect to original hearings, the
administrative law judges shall have such jurisdiction and
powers as are vested in the division of workers'
compensation under other sections of this chapter, and
wherever in this chapter the word "commission",
"commissioners" or "division" is used in respect to any
original hearing, those terms shall mean the administrative
law judges appointed under this section. When a hearing is
necessary upon any claim, the division shall assign an
administrative law judge to such hearing. Any
administrative law judge shall have power to approve
contracts of settlement, as provided by section 287.390,
between the parties to any compensation claim or dispute
under this chapter pending before the division of workers'
compensation. Any award by an administrative law judge upon
an original hearing shall have the same force and effect,
shall be enforceable in the same manner as provided
elsewhere in this chapter for awards by the labor and

SB 996 9
industrial relations commission, and shall be subject to
review as provided by section 287.480.
[6.] 3. Any of the administrative law judges employed
pursuant to this section may be assigned on a temporary
basis to the branch offices as necessary in order to ensure
the proper administration of this chapter.
[7.] 4. All administrative law judges shall be
required to participate in, on a continuing basis, specific
training that shall pertain to those elements of knowledge
and procedure necessary for the efficient and competent
performance of the administrative law judges' required
duties and responsibilities. Such training requirements
shall be established by the division subject to
appropriations and shall include training in medical
determinations and records, mediation and legal issues
pertaining to workers' compensation adjudication. Such
training may be credited toward any continuing legal
education requirements.
[8. (1) The administrative law judge review committee
shall conduct a performance audit of all administrative law
judges every two years. The audit results, stating the
committee's recommendation of confidence or no confidence of
each administrative law judge shall be sent to the governor
no later than the first week of each legislative session
immediately following such audit. Any administrative law
judge who has received three or more votes of no confidence
under two successive performance audits by the committee may
have their appointment immediately withdrawn.
(2) The review committee shall consist of one member
appointed by the president pro tem of the senate, one member
appointed by the minority leader of the senate, one member
100 appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives,

SB 996 10
101 and one member appointed by the minority leader of the house
102 of representatives. The governor shall appoint to the
103 committee one member selected from the commission on
104 retirement, removal, and discipline of judges. This
105 member shall act as a member ex officio and shall not have a
106 vote in the committee. The committee shall annually elect a
107 chairperson from its members for a term of one year. The
108 term of service for all members shall be two years. The
109 review committee members shall all serve without
110 compensation. Necessary expenses for review committee
111 members and all necessary support services to the review
112 committee shall be provided by the division.]
113 5. The director of the division may file a complaint
114 with the administrative hearing commission, as provided
115 under chapter 621, seeking to remove an administrative law
116 judge from office if the administrative law judge:
117 (1) Has committed any felony, as defined in
118 subdivision (26) of section 556.061, or misdemeanor, as
119 defined in subdivision (33) of section 556.061, regardless
120 of whether a criminal charge has been filed;
121 (2) Has been convicted, or has entered a plea of
122 guilty or nolo contendere in a criminal prosecution under
123 the laws of any state, the United States, or of any country,
124 regardless of whether sentence is imposed;
125 (3) Is guilty of misconduct, habitual intoxication,
126 willful neglect of duty, corruption in office, or
127 incompetency; or
128 (4) Has committed any act that involves moral
129 turpitude or oppression in office.
130 6. (1) Prior to the filing of the complaint, the
131 director shall notify the administrative law judge in
132 writing of the reasons for the complaint.

SB 996 11
133 (2) If the reason for the complaint is willful neglect
134 of duty or incompetency, the administrative law judge shall
135 have ninety days from the date the complaint was made to
136 remedy the complained of behavior. If such complained of
137 behavior has not been remedied after ninety days, the
138 director may file the complaint with the administrative
139 hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
140 7. After the director has filed a complaint with the
141 administrative hearing commission, the proceedings shall be
142 conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 621.
143 Upon a finding by the administrative hearing commission that:
144 (1) The grounds, provided in subsection 5 of this
145 section, for disciplinary action are met, the director may,
146 singly or in combination, issue the following disciplinary
147 actions against the administrative law judge: removal from
148 office, suspension from the performance of duties for a
149 period of time, or other discipline as determined by the
150 director. The director shall make a record of written
151 findings of fact and conclusions of law with respect to the
152 issues and shall put a copy of such record in the
153 administrative law judge's permanent file; or
154 (2) There are no grounds for disciplinary action, the
155 administrative law judge shall immediately resume duties and
156 shall receive any attorney's fees due under section 536.087.
157 8. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
158 the contrary, the following events or acts by an
159 administrative law judge are deemed to be an immediate
160 threat to the administration of the provisions of chapter
161 287 and shall be considered cause for suspension with pay of
162 the administrative law judge without notice, at the
163 discretion of the director:

SB 996 12
164 (1) A crime for which the administrative law judge is
165 being held without bond for a period of more than fourteen
166 days;
167 (2) Suspension or revocation of a license to practice
168 law; or
169 (3) A declaration of incapacity by a court of
170 competent jurisdiction.
171 9. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated pursuant
172 to the authority of this section shall become effective
173 unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
174 chapter 536.
287.615. 1. The division may appoint or employ such
persons as may be necessary to the proper administration of
this chapter. All salaries to clerical employees shall be
fixed by the division and approved by the labor and
industrial relations commission. Beginning January 1, 2006,
the annual salary of each administrative law judge[,] and
administrative law judge in charge[, and chief legal
counsel] shall be as follows:
(1) [For any chief legal counsel located at the
division office in Jefferson City, Missouri, compensation at
two thousand dollars above eighty percent of the rate at
which an associate circuit judge is compensated;
(2)] For each administrative law judge, compensation
at ninety percent of the rate at which an associate division
circuit judge is compensated;
[(3)] (2) For each administrative law judge in charge,
compensation at the same rate as an administrative law judge
plus [five] ten thousand dollars.
2. Administrative law judges' and chief administrative
law judges' compensation shall be determined solely by the

SB 996 13
rate outlined in this section and shall not increase when
pay raises for executive employees are appropriated.
3. In the event that any administrative law judge is
deployed as a member of the National Guard, the judge shall
receive up to one hundred twenty days of salary, but in no
event longer than the period of deployment.
4. The salary of the director of the division of
workers' compensation shall be set by the director of the
department of labor and industrial relations, but shall not
be less than the salary plus two thousand dollars of an
administrative law judge in charge. The appointees in each
classification shall be selected as nearly as practicable in
equal numbers from each of the two political parties casting
the highest and the next highest number of votes for
governor in the last preceding state election.
287.812. As used in sections 287.812 to 287.855,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Administrative law judge", any person appointed
pursuant to section 287.610 or section 621.015, or any
person who hereafter may have by law all of the powers now
vested by law in administrative law judges appointed under
the provisions of the workers' compensation law;
(2) "Beneficiary", a surviving spouse married to the
deceased administrative law judge or legal advisor of the
division of workers' compensation continuously for a period
of at least two years immediately preceding the
administrative law judge's or legal advisor's death and also
on the day of the last termination of such person's
employment as an administrative law judge or legal advisor
for the division of workers' compensation, or if there is no
surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits, any minor

SB 996 14
child of the deceased administrative law judge or legal
advisor, or any child of the deceased administrative law
judge or legal advisor who, regardless of age, is unable to
support himself because of intellectual disability, disease
or disability, or any physical handicap or disability, who
shall share in the benefits on an equal basis with all other
beneficiaries;
(3) "Benefit", a series of equal monthly payments
payable during the life of an administrative law judge or
legal advisor of the division of workers' compensation
retiring pursuant to the provisions of sections 287.812 to
287.855 or payable to a beneficiary as provided in sections
287.812 to 287.850;
(4) "Board", the board of trustees of the Missouri
state employees' retirement system;
(5) ["Chief legal counsel", any person appointed or
employed under section 287.615 to serve in the capacity of
legal counsel to the division;
(6)] "Division", the division of workers' compensation
of the state of Missouri;
[(7)] (6) "Legal advisor", any person appointed or
employed pursuant to section 287.600[,] or 287.615[, or
287.616] to serve in the capacity as a legal advisor or an
associate administrative law judge and any person appointed
pursuant to section 286.010 or pursuant to section 295.030,
and any attorney or legal counsel appointed or employed
pursuant to section 286.070;
[(8)] (7) "Salary", the total annual compensation paid
for personal services as an administrative law judge or
legal advisor, or both, of the division of workers'
compensation by the state or any of its political
subdivisions.

SB 996 15
287.835. [1. No benefits provided pursuant to
sections 287.812 to 287.855 shall be paid to any person who
has been removed from office by impeachment or for
misconduct, nor to any person who has been disbarred from
the practice of law, nor to the beneficiary of any such
persons.
2.] The board of trustees of the Missouri state
employees' retirement system shall cease paying benefits to
any beneficiary of an administrative law judge or legal
advisor who is charged with the intentional killing of the
administrative law judge or legal advisor without legal
excuse or justification. A beneficiary who is convicted of
such charges shall no longer be entitled to receive
benefits. If the beneficiary is not convicted of such
charge, the board shall resume payment of benefits and shall
pay the beneficiary any benefits that were suspended pending
resolution of such charge.
621.045. 1. The administrative hearing commission
shall conduct hearings and make findings of fact and
conclusions of law in those cases when, under the law, a
license issued by any of the following agencies may be
revoked or suspended or when the licensee may be placed on
probation or when an agency refuses to permit an applicant
to be examined upon his or her qualifications or refuses to
issue or renew a license of an applicant who has passed an
examination for licensure or who possesses the
qualifications for licensure without examination:
Missouri State Board of Accountancy
Missouri State Board for Architects, Professional
Engineers, Professional Land Surveyors and Landscape
Architects
Board of Barber Examiners

SB 996 16
Board of Cosmetology
Board of Chiropody and Podiatry
Board of Chiropractic Examiners
Missouri Dental Board
Board of Embalmers and Funeral Directors
Board of Registration for the Healing Arts
Board of Nursing
Board of Optometry
Board of Pharmacy
Missouri Real Estate Commission
Missouri Veterinary Medical Board
Supervisor of Liquor Control
Department of Health and Senior Services
Department of Commerce and Insurance
Department of Mental Health
Board of Private Investigator Examiners.
2. If in the future there are created by law any new
or additional administrative agencies which have the power
to issue, revoke, suspend, or place on probation any
license, then those agencies are under the provisions of
this law.
3. The administrative hearing commission is authorized
to conduct hearings and make findings of fact and
conclusions of law in those cases brought by the Missouri
state board for architects, professional engineers,
professional land surveyors and landscape architects against
unlicensed persons under section 327.076.
4. The administrative hearing commission is authorized
to conduct hearings and make findings of fact and
conclusions of law in those cases brought by the division of
workers' compensation of the department of labor and

SB 996 17
industrial relations against administrative law judges under
section 287.610.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section
to the contrary, after August 28, 1995, in order to
encourage settlement of disputes between any agency
described in subsection 1 or 2 of this section and its
licensees, any such agency shall:
(1) Provide the licensee with a written description of
the specific conduct for which discipline is sought and a
citation to the law and rules allegedly violated, together
with copies of any documents which are the basis thereof and
the agency's initial settlement offer, or file a contested
case against the licensee;
(2) If no contested case has been filed against the
licensee, allow the licensee at least sixty days, from the
date of mailing, to consider the agency's initial settlement
offer and to contact the agency to discuss the terms of such
settlement offer;
(3) If no contested case has been filed against the
licensee, advise the licensee that the licensee may, either
at the time the settlement agreement is signed by all
parties, or within fifteen days thereafter, submit the
agreement to the administrative hearing commission for
determination that the facts agreed to by the parties to the
settlement constitute grounds for denying or disciplining
the license of the licensee; and
(4) In any contact under this subsection by the agency
or its counsel with a licensee who is not represented by
counsel, advise the licensee that the licensee has the right
to consult an attorney at the licensee's own expense.
[5.] 6. If the licensee desires review by the
administrative hearing commission under subdivision (3) of

SB 996 18
subsection [4] 5 of this section at any time prior to the
settlement becoming final, the licensee may rescind and
withdraw from the settlement and any admissions of fact or
law in the agreement shall be deemed withdrawn and not
admissible for any purposes under the law against the
licensee. Any settlement submitted to the administrative
hearing commission shall not be effective and final unless
and until findings of fact and conclusions of law are
entered by the administrative hearing commission that the
facts agreed to by the parties to the settlement constitute
grounds for denying or disciplining the license of the
licensee.
[6.] 7. When a holder of a license, registration,
permit, or certificate of authority issued by the division
of professional registration or a board, commission, or
committee of the division of professional registration
against whom an affirmative decision is sought has failed to
plead or otherwise respond in the contested case and
adequate notice has been given under sections 536.067 and
621.100 upon a properly pled writing filed to initiate the
contested case under this chapter or chapter 536, a default
100 decision shall be entered against the licensee without
101 further proceedings. The default decision shall grant such
102 relief as requested by the division of professional
103 registration, board, committee, commission, or office in the
104 writing initiating the contested case as allowed by law.
105 Upon motion stating facts constituting a meritorious defense
106 and for good cause shown, a default decision may be set
107 aside. The motion shall be made within a reasonable time,
108 not to exceed thirty days after entry of the default
109 decision. "Good cause" includes a mistake or conduct that

SB 996 19
110 is not intentionally or recklessly designed to impede the
111 administrative process.
✓